Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
ARTICLE 8
UNDERGROUND CONVERSION OF UTILITIES

Section

29-8-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Underground Conversion of Utilities Act".

Source:

L. 71:

p. 987, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-1.

29-8-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds that landowners, cities, towns, counties, public utilities, and cable operators in many areas of the state desire to convert existing overhead electric and communication facilities to underground locations. The general assembly further finds that the conversion of overhead electric and communication facilities to underground locations is a matter of statewide concern and interest. The general assembly declares that a public purpose will be served by providing a procedure to accomplish such conversion and that it is in the public interest to provide for such conversion by proceedings taken under this article, whether such areas are within the limits of a city or town or within a county. The general assembly further declares that all political subdivisions shall pursue such conversion only in accordance with this article; except that the use of the procedure set forth in this article is permissive and not mandatory for incidental and episodic conversions associated with public improvements such as street widening or sewer construction. Notwithstanding the provisions of this article, a political subdivision shall be able to perform such underground conversion without following the procedures outlined in this article if the political subdivision pays for all of the costs and expenses of such conversion from the political subdivision's own funds on the condition that the political subdivision does not seek to recover the costs or expenses of such conversion from the public utility or cable operator.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 987, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-2.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 372, § 1, effective April 22.

29-8-103. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Cable operator" shall have the same meaning as set forth in the federal "Cable Communications Policy Act of 1984", as amended, 47 U.S.C. sec. 522.

(1.5) "Communication service" means the transmission of intelligence by electrical means, including, but not limited to, telephone, telegraph, messenger-call, block, police, fire alarm, and traffic control circuits or the transmission of television or radio signals.

"Convert" or "conversion" means the removal of all or any part of any existing overhead electric or communications facilities and the replacement thereof with underground electric or communication facilities constructed at the same or different locations.

"Electric or communication facilities" means any works or improvements used or useful in providing electric or communication service, including, but not limited to, poles, supports, tunnels, manholes, vaults, conduits, pipes, wires, conductors, guys, stubs, platforms, crossarms, braces, transformers, insulators, cut-outs, switches, capacitors, meters, communication circuits, appliances, attachments, and appurtenances.

"Electric service" means the transmission and distribution of electricity for heat, light, or power.

"Governing body" means the board of county commissioners or city council or board of trustees, as may be appropriate, depending on whether the improvement district is located in a county or within a city or town.

"Net effective interest rate" means the net interest cost of bonds divided by the sum of the products derived by multiplying the principal amounts of the securities maturing on each maturity date by the number of years from their date to their respective maturities. In all cases, the net effective interest rate shall be computed without regard to any option of redemption prior to the designated maturity dates of the bonds.

"Overhead electric or communication facilities" means electric or communication facilities located, in whole or in part, above the surface of the ground.

(7.5) "Political subdivision" means a county, city and county, city, town, home rule city, home rule town, service authority, school district, local improvement district, law enforcement authority, any special district such as water, sanitation, fire protection, metropolitan, irrigation, or drainage, or any other kind of municipal, quasi-municipal, or public corporation organized pursuant to law.

"Public utility" means one or more persons or corporations that provide electric or communication service to the public by means of electric or communication facilities and shall include any city, county, special district, or public corporation that provides electric or communication service to the public by means of electric or communication facilities.

"Resolution" means ordinance, where the governing body properly acts by ordinance, or resolution, where the governing body is authorized to act by resolution.

"Underground electric or communication facilities" means electric or communication facilities located, in whole or in part, beneath the surface of the ground, or facilities within the confines of a power substation. "Communication facilities" does not include facilities used or intended to be used for the transmission of intelligence by microwave or radio or outdoor public telephones. "Underground facilities" includes certain facilities even though such facilities remain above the surface, in accordance with standard underground practices, such as transformers, pull boxes, service terminals, meters, pedestal terminals, splice closures, apparatus cabinets, and similar facilities.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 987, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-3.

L. 99:

(1) amended and (1.5) and (7.5) added, p. 373, § 2, effective April 22.

L. 2001:

(3) and (4) amended, p. 240, § 1, effective July 1.

29-8-104. Powers conferred.

The governing body of every county is authorized to create local improvement districts under this article within the unincorporated portion of such county, and the governing body of every city and town is authorized to create local improvement districts under this article within its territorial limits to provide for the conversion of existing overhead electric or communication facilities to underground locations and the construction, reconstruction, or relocation of any other electric or communication facilities which may be incidental thereto, under the provisions of this article.

The governing body of every municipal utility may, by resolution or ordinance, impose a surcharge on those consumers within such municipal utility's service area who derive a direct benefit from the conversion of overhead electric and communication facilities to underground locations.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 988, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-4.

L. 99:

(2) added, p. 373, § 4, effective April 22.

29-8-105. Basis of assessments.

When any improvement authorized to be made by any governing body by the terms of this article is ordered, the governing body shall provide for the apportionment of the cost and expenses thereof as in its judgment may be fair and equitable in consideration of the benefits accruing to the abutting, adjoining, contiguous, and adjacent lots and lands, and to the lots and lands otherwise benefited and included within the improvement district formed. Each lot and parcel of the land shall be separately assessed for the cost and expenses thereof in proportion to the number of square feet of such lands and lots abutting, adjoining, contiguous, and adjacent thereto or included in the improvement district, or assessed upon a frontage, zone, or other equitable basis, in accordance with the benefits, as the same may be determined by the governing body. The entire cost of the improvement may be assessed against the benefited property as provided in this article or if money for paying part of such cost is available from any other source, the money so available may be so applied and the remaining cost so assessed against the benefited property. The cost and expenses to be assessed as provided in this article shall include the cost of the improvement, engineering and clerical service, advertising, cost of inspection, cost of collecting assessments, and interest upon bonds if issued, and for legal services for preparing proceedings and advising in regard thereto. Fee lands and property of public entities, such as the federal government, state of Colorado, or any county, city, or town, shall not be considered as lands or property benefited by any improvement district, and unless such public entity within the boundaries of an improvement district consents in writing, filed before the governing body adopts the resolution provided for in section 29-8-109, the lands and property of such public entity shall not be subject to assessment for the payment of any of the cost or expense of such improvement.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 989, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-5.

29-8-106. Resolution for cost and feasibility study.

Any governing body may on its own initiative, or upon a petition signed by at least a majority of the property owners owning at least a majority of the assessable land of any proposed district requesting the creation of an improvement district as provided in this article, pass a resolution at any regular or special meeting declaring that it finds that the improvement district is in the public interest. It must be determined that the formation of the local improvement district for the purposes set out in this article will promote the public convenience, necessity, and welfare.

The resolution must state that the costs and expenses will be levied and assessed upon the property benefited and further request that each public utility serving such area by overhead electric or communication facilities shall make a study of the cost of conversion of its facilities in such area to underground service.

The report of said study shall be provided to the governing body and made available in its office to all owners of land within the proposed improvement district. The resolution of the governing body shall require that the public utility be provided with the name and address of the owner of each parcel or lot within the proposed improvement district, if known, and if not known the description of the property and such other matters as may be required by the public utility in order to perform the work involved in the cost study.

The resolution shall further state the governing body's preliminary determination as to the method of assessing each lot or parcel within the proposed improvement district area and shall provide the square feet or frontage feet of each lot or parcel, and zone or other information necessary for assessment in accordance with the governing body's preliminary determination. All public utilities serving such improvement district areas by overhead electric or communication facilities shall, within one hundred twenty days after receipt of the resolution, unless such time is extended, make a study of the costs of conversion of their facilities in such district to underground service, and the public utilities shall together provide to the governing body, and make available at their respective offices, a joint report as to the results of the study.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 989, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-6.

29-8-107. Bond of petitioners.

At the time that action is commenced under section 29-8-106, or at any time prior to the time of the hearing provided for in section 29-8-112, and if requested by the governing body or public utility, a bond shall be filed, with security approved by the governing body or cash deposit made sufficient to pay all expenses of the governing body connected with the proceedings and of the public utilities for actual time and expenses incurred in regard to the cost and feasibility study in case the organization of the district is not effected. If at any time during the organization proceedings the governing body is satisfied that the bond first executed or the amount of cash deposited is insufficient in amount, it, on its own initiative or at the request of a public utility, may require the execution of an additional bond or the deposit of additional cash within a time to be fixed, not less than ten days distant, and upon failure of the petitioners to file or deposit the same, the petition shall be dismissed.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 990, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-7.

29-8-108. Costs and feasibility report.

The public utility report shall set forth an estimate of the total underground conversion costs and shall also indicate the costs of underground conversion of facilities of the public utility located within the boundaries of the various parcels or lots then receiving service. The report shall also contain the public utility's recommendations concerning the feasibility of the project for the district proposed insofar as the physical characteristics of the district are concerned. The report shall make recommendations by the public utility concerning inclusion or exclusion of areas within the district or immediately adjacent to the district.

The governing body shall give careful consideration to the public utility's recommendations concerning feasibility, recognizing its expertise in this area, and it may amend the boundaries of the proposed improvement district provided that the costs and feasibility report of the public utility contains a cost figure on the district as amended, or it may request a new costs and feasibility report from the public utility concerned on the basis of the amended district.

The cost estimate contained in the report shall not be considered binding on the public utility if construction is not commenced within six months of the submission of the estimate, for reasons not within the control of the public utility. Should such a delay result in a significant increase of the conversion cost, new hearings shall be held on the creation of the district. If only a minor increase results, only the hearing on the assessments need be held again.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 990, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-8.

29-8-109. Resolution declaring intention to create district.

On the filing with the clerk of any governing body of the cost and feasibility report by the public utility, as provided in section 29-8-108 and after considering the same, the governing body may, at any regular or special meeting, pass a resolution declaring its intention to create a local improvement district. The resolution shall state: That the costs and expenses of the district created are, except as otherwise provided for, to be levied and assessed upon the abutting, adjoining, and adjacent lots and lands along or upon which improvements are to be made, and upon lots and lands benefited by such improvements and included in the improvement district created; that it is the intention of the governing body to make such improvement which will promote public convenience, necessity, and welfare; and the area and boundaries of the proposed improvement district, the character of the proposed improvement, the estimated total cost of the same, and the intention of the governing body to hold a public hearing on the proposed improvement.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 991, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-9.

29-8-110. Notice of public hearing on proposed improvement - contents.

Following the passage of the resolution in section 29-8-109, the governing body shall cause a notice of a public hearing on the proposed improvement to be given in the manner provided in section 29-8-111. Such notice shall:

Describe the boundaries or area of the district with sufficient particularity to permit each owner of real property therein to ascertain that his property lies in the district;

Describe in a general way the proposed improvement, specifying the streets or property along which it will be made and the nature of the benefits to the property within the district;

State the estimated cost, as determined from the costs and feasibility report, and including the cost of the improvement and the cost of engineering and clerical service, advertising, inspection, collection of assessments, interests upon bonds, if issued, and for legal services for preparing proceedings and advising in regard thereto;

State that it is proposed to assess the real property in the district to pay all or a designated portion of the cost of the improvement according to the benefits to be derived by each tract, block, lot, and parcel of land within the district, and the proposed means of apportioning such cost;

State the time and place at which the governing body will conduct a public hearing upon the proposed improvement and on the question of benefits to be derived by the real property in the district;

State that all interested persons will be heard and that any property owner will be heard on the question of whether his property will be benefited by the proposed improvement.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 991, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-10.

29-8-111. Notice of public hearing on proposed improvement - manner of giving.

Such notice shall be published in full one time in a newspaper of general circulation in the district or, if there is no such newspaper, by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county, city, or town in which said district is located. A copy of such notice shall be mailed to the last known address of each owner of land within the proposed district whose property will be assessed for the cost of the improvement. The address to be used for said purpose shall be that last appearing on the real property records in the office of the county treasurer of the county wherein said property is located. In addition, a copy of such notice shall be addressed to "owner" and shall be so mailed, addressed to the street number of each piece of improved property to be affected by the assessment. Mailed notices and the published notice shall state where a copy of the resolution creating the district will be available for inspection by any interested parties.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 992, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-11.

29-8-112. Public hearing - changes in proposed improvements and area to be included in district.

On the date and at the time and place specified in the aforesaid notice, the governing body shall, in open and public session, hear all objections to the creation of the proposed district, the making of the proposed improvements, and the benefits accruing to any tract, block, lot, or parcel of land therein. Representatives of the public utility concerned shall be present at all such hearings. Such hearing may be adjourned from time to time to a fixed future time and place. If at any time during the hearings it appears to the governing body that changes in the proposed improvements or the proposed district should be made, which, after consultation with the public utility concerned, appear to affect either the cost or feasibility of the improvements, the hearing shall be adjourned to a fixed future time and place and a new cost and feasibility report prepared on the basis of the contemplated changes.

If action on the creation of the improvement district was initiated by petition as set forth in section 29-8-106, and if it appears that said petition is not signed by at least a majority of the property owners owning at least a majority of the assessable land of the proposed district, or if it is shown that the proposed improvement will not confer a general benefit on the district, or that the cost of the improvement would be excessive as compared with the value of the property in the district, the governing body shall thereupon dismiss the petition and adjudge the cost against those executing the bond filed to pay such costs. No appeal shall lie from the order dismissing said proceedings. Nothing in this section may prevent the filing of subsequent petitions for a similar district. The right to renew such a proceeding is expressly granted and authorized.

After the hearing has been concluded and after all persons desiring to be heard have been heard, the governing body shall consider the arguments put forth and may make such changes in the area to be included in the district as it may consider desirable or necessary. However, no such changes shall be made unless a costs and feasibility report has been prepared on the basis of such changes.

If at any time during the public hearing the governing body is presented with a petition signed by at least a majority of the property owners owning at least a majority of the assessable land of the proposed district protesting the proposed improvement, and such a petition is still outstanding at the close of the public hearing, the district and project shall be abandoned.

If there is no such petition outstanding, the governing body, after consideration of matters brought forth at the public hearing, shall either abandon the district and project or adopt a resolution establishing the district and authorizing the project, either as described in the notice or with changes made as authorized in this section. Such resolution shall be published in the manner provided in section 29-8-111 but need not be mailed. If a resolution is adopted establishing the district, such resolution shall finally and conclusively establish the regular organization of the district against all persons, unless an action attacking the validity of the organization is commenced in a court of competent jurisdiction within thirty days after the adopting of such resolution. Such action shall be subject to the provisions of section 29-8-113. Thereafter, any such action shall be perpetually barred and the organization of said district shall not be directly or collaterally questioned in any suit, action, or proceeding.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 992, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-12.

29-8-113. Waiver of objections.

Every person who has real property within the boundaries of the district and who fails to appear before the governing body at the hearing and make any objection he may have to the creation of the district, the making of the improvements, and the inclusion of his real property in the district shall be deemed to have waived every such objection. Such waiver shall not, however, preclude his right to object to the amount of the assessment at the hearing for which provision is made in section 29-8-117.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 993, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-13.

29-8-114. Proposed assessment list.

After a decision is made by a governing body to proceed with the district and project, it shall cause to be prepared an assessment list detailing the total amount to be assessed, the specific properties assessed, and the amount of assessment on each piece of property.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 993, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-14.

29-8-115. Proposed assessment resolution.

After the preparation of the proposed assessment list, the governing body shall cause to be prepared for adoption at the hearing provided for in section 29-8-117, a resolution declaring the entire cost of improvement, including the cost of construction as determined from the costs and feasibility report, other incidental costs, legal and fiscal fees and costs, the cost of the publication of notices, and all other costs properly incident to the construction of the improvement and the financing and collecting thereof. Such resolution shall specify what share, if any, of the total cost is payable from sources other than the imposition of assessments, and shall incorporate the proposed assessment list provided for in section 29-8-114.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 993, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-15.

29-8-116. Notice of public hearing on proposed assessments.

After the preparation of the aforesaid resolution, notice of a public hearing on the proposed assessments shall be given. Such notice shall be published one time in a newspaper in which the first notice of hearing was published at least twenty days before the date fixed for the hearing, and shall be mailed not less than fifteen days prior to the date fixed for such hearing to each owner of real property whose property will be assessed for part of the cost of the improvement at the last known address of such owner, using for such purpose the names and addresses appearing on the last completed real property assessment rolls of the county wherein said affected property is located. In addition, a copy of such notice shall be addressed to "owner" and shall be so mailed, addressed to the street number of each piece of improved property to be affected by such assessment.

Each notice shall state that at the specified time and place the governing body will hold a public hearing upon the proposed assessments and shall state that any owner of any property to be assessed pursuant to the resolution will be heard on the question of whether his property will be benefited by the proposed improvement to the amount of the proposed assessment against his property and whether the amount assessed against his property constitutes more than his proper proportional share of the total cost of the improvement.

The notice shall further state where a copy of the resolution proposed to be adopted levying the assessments against all real property in the district will be on file for public inspection, and that subject to such changes and corrections therein as may be made by the governing body, it is proposed to adopt the resolution at the conclusion of the hearing.

The public notice shall describe the boundaries or area of the district with sufficient particularity to permit each owner of real property therein to ascertain that his property lies in the district. The mailed notice may refer to the district by name and date of creation and shall state the amount of the assessment proposed to be levied against the real property of the person to whom the notice is mailed. In the absence of fraud, the failure to mail any notice does not invalidate any assessment or any proceeding under this article.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 993, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-16.

29-8-117. Public hearing on proposed assessment resolution.

On the date and at the time and place specified in the aforesaid notice, the governing body shall, in open and public session, hear all arguments relating to the benefits accruing to any tract, block, lot, or parcel of land therein and the amounts proposed to be assessed against any such tract, block, lot, or parcel. The hearing may be adjourned from time to time to a fixed future time and place. After the hearing has been concluded and all persons desiring to be heard have been heard, the governing body shall consider the arguments presented and shall make such corrections in the assessment list as may be considered just and equitable. Such corrections may eliminate, may increase, or may decrease the amount of the assessment proposed to be levied against any piece of property. However, no increase of any proposed assessment shall be valid unless the owner of the property is given notice and an opportunity to be heard.

After such corrections have been made, the governing body shall make a specific finding that no proposed assessment on the corrected assessment list exceeds the benefit to be derived from the improvement by the piece of property to be so assessed and that no piece of property so listed will bear more than its proper proportionate share of the cost of such improvement.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 994, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-17.

29-8-118. Adoption of the assessment resolution.

After the public hearing has been concluded and all corrections made to the assessment list, the governing body shall proceed to adopt the assessment resolution. The adoption of such resolution shall be prima facie evidence of the fact that the property assessed is benefited in the amount of the assessments and that such assessments have been lawfully levied.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 995, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-18.

29-8-119. Assessment roll.

The clerk of the governing body shall prepare a local assessment roll in book form showing in suitable columns each piece of land assessed, the total amount of assessment, the amount of each installment of principal and interest if, in pursuance of this article, the same is payable in installments, and the date when each installment will become due, with suitable columns for use, in case of payment of the whole amount or of any installment or penalty, and he shall deliver the same, duly certified, under seal as appropriate, to the proper officer for collection.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 995, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-19.

29-8-120. Payment of assessment.

All assessments shall be due and payable within thirty days after the final publication of the assessing resolution without demand; except that all such assessments may be paid, at the election of the owner, in installments, with interest, as provided in section 29-8-121.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 995, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-20.

29-8-121. Installment payments.

Failure to pay the whole assessment within said period of thirty days shall be conclusively considered to be an election on the part of all persons interested, whether under disability or otherwise, to pay in such installments. In case of such election, the assessment shall be payable in equal annual or semiannual installments of principal, the first of which installments shall be payable as prescribed by the governing body, and the last installment within not more than twenty years, with interest in all cases on the unpaid principal, payable annually or semiannually at a rate not exceeding the maximum net effective interest rate authorized by the governing body. The number of installments, the period of payments, the date of the initial payment, and the maximum net effective interest rate shall be determined by the governing body and set forth in the resolution required by section 29-8-115.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 995, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-21.

29-8-122. Failure to pay installments.

Failure to pay any installment, whether of principal or interest, when due shall cause the whole of the unpaid principal to become due and collectable immediately, and the whole amount of the unpaid principal and accrued interest shall thereafter draw interest at the rate of one percent per month or fraction of a month until the day of sale; but at any time prior to the day of sale, the owner may pay the amount of all unpaid installments, with interest at one percent per month or fraction of a month, and all penalties accrued, and shall thereupon be restored to the right thereafter to pay in installments in the same manner as if the default had not been suffered.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 995, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-22.

29-8-123. Discount - assessment roll returned.

Payment may be made to the city or town treasurer at any time within thirty days after the final publication of the assessing resolution and an allowance of five percent shall be made on all payments made during such period, but not thereafter. In the case of cities and towns, at the expiration of said thirty-day period, the city or town treasurer shall return the local assessment roll to the clerk, therein showing all payments made thereon, with the date of each payment. Said roll shall be certified by the city or town clerk under the seal of the city or town, and be hand delivered to the county treasurer of the same county, with his warrant for the collection of the same. The county treasurer shall show receipt for the same and all such rolls shall be numbered for convenient reference.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 995, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-23.

29-8-124. Sale of property for nonpayment.

The county treasurer shall receive payment of all installment payments of assessments appearing upon the assessment roll, with interest. In case of default in the payment of any installment of principal or interest when due, the county treasurer shall advertise and sell any property concerning which such default is suffered for the payment of the whole of the unpaid assessment thereon. Said advertisements and sales shall be made at the same times, in the same manner, under all the same conditions and penalties, and with the same effect as provided by general law for sales of real estate in default of payment of general taxes.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 996, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-24.

29-8-125. Owner of interest may pay share.

The owner of any divided or undivided interest in the property assessed may pay his share of any assessment, upon producing evidence of the extent of his interest, satisfactory to the treasurer having the roll in charge.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 996, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-25.

29-8-126. When collections paid city.

In the case of improvement districts located within cities or towns, all collections made by the county treasurer upon such assessment roll in any calendar month shall be accounted for and paid over to the city or town treasurer on or before the tenth day of the next succeeding calendar month, with separate statements for all such collections for each improvement district.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 996, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-26.

29-8-127. Assessment lien.

All assessments made under this article, together with all interest thereon and penalties for default in payment thereof, and all costs in collecting the same, shall constitute, from the date of the final publication of the assessing resolution, a perpetual lien in the several amounts assessed against each lot or tract of land, and shall have priority over all other liens excepting general tax liens. No sale of property for the nonpayment of taxes or other special assessments shall extinguish the lien of other than the taxes or special assessments for the nonpayment of which such sale is had.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 996, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-27.

29-8-128. Advance payment of assessment installments.

The governing body may, in the resolution levying the assessments, provide that all unpaid installments of assessments levied against any piece of property may (but only in their entirety) be paid prior to the dates on which they become due, if the property owner paying such installments pays all interest which would accrue thereon to the next succeeding date on which interest is payable on the bonds issued in anticipation of the collection of the assessments. In addition, the property owner must pay such additional amount of interest as in the opinion of the governing body is necessary to assure the availability of money fully sufficient to pay interest on the bonds as interest becomes due, and any redemption premiums which may become payable on the bonds in order to retire, in advance of maturity, bonds in a sufficient amount to utilize the assessments thus paid in advance. If no bonds have been issued, then all unpaid installments of assessments levied against any piece of property may be paid in their entirety prior to the date upon which they become due by paying the principal amount due and the interest accrued thereon to the date of payment.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 996, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-28.

29-8-129. Issuance of bonds.

After the expiration of thirty days from the effective date of the resolution levying the assessments, the governing body may borrow money and issue negotiable interest-bearing bonds in a principal amount not exceeding the unpaid balance of the assessments levied. The bonds shall be authorized by resolution of the governing body. The resolution shall prescribe the form of said bonds, the manner of their execution, which may be effected by the use of the facsimile signatures of the officers of the governing body in accordance with the laws of the state in effect at the time of their execution, shall provide for the terms thereof, including the maximum net effective interest rate for the issue of bonds, and may direct that the bonds shall be sold at public or private sale at or below par. The bonds shall not be sold at a price such that the net effective interest rate of the issue of bonds exceeds the maximum net effective interest rate authorized.

The governing body shall prescribe other details in connection with the issue of bonds. The bonds so authorized shall mature serially over a period of not exceeding twenty years, but in no event shall such bonds extend over a longer period of time than the period of time over which such installments of special assessments are due and payable and ninety days thereafter.

The bonds shall be of such form and denomination and shall be payable in principal and interest at such times and place, and shall be sold, authorized, and issued in such manner as the governing body may determine. The bonds shall be dated no earlier than the date on which the special assessment shall begin to bear interest, and shall be secured by and payable from the irrevocable pledge and dedication of the funds derived from the levy and collection of the special assessments in anticipation of the collection of which they are issued. Said resolution and bonds may also include such other terms or recitals which, in the judgment of the governing body, are necessary or proper to render the same marketable.

Any premium received on the sale of the bonds may be applied as other bond proceeds or if not so applied, the same shall be placed in the fund for the payment of principal of and interest on the bonds. The bonds shall be callable for redemption from the proceeds of the sale of any property sold for the nonpayment of special assessments, but not otherwise unless the bonds on the face thereof provide for redemption prior to maturity. The governing body may provide that the bonds shall be redeemable on any interest payment date prior to maturity pursuant to such notice and at such premiums as it deems advisable. Interest may be evidenced by interest coupons attached to such bonds and signed with a facsimile signature, as above provided, of one of the individuals who signed the bonds.

In connection with the issuance of bonds payable solely from special assessments, the governing body may provide for the submission of the question of issuing such bonds to the registered electors eligible to vote on the question. For local improvement districts created by the governing body of any county pursuant to this article, the governing body may provide that all registered electors of the county shall be eligible to vote on the question or that only registered electors who are owners of property within or residents of the district shall be eligible to vote. For local improvement districts created by the governing body of any city or town pursuant to this article, the governing body may provide that all registered electors of the city or town shall be eligible to vote on the question or that only registered electors who are owners of property within or residents of the district shall be eligible to vote.

In connection with the issuance of bonds payable from special assessments which are additionally secured by a pledge of any other funds of the county, city, or town, the governing body may provide for the submission of the question of issuing the bonds to all registered electors of the county, city, or town.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 997, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-29.

L. 87:

(1) amended, p. 325, § 72, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1) amended and (5) and (6) added, p. 1188, § 83, effective July 1.